Ohio, session 136, HB725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4549.07 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4549.07. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Automated license plate recognition system" means a system of one or more mobile or fixed high-speed cameras, combined with computer algorithms, that is capable of converting images of license plates into computer-readable data. (2) "Law enforcement agency" means a government entity that employs peace officers to perform law enforcement duties. (3) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes the superintendent and troopers of the state highway patrol. (B) No person, for commercial purposes, shall knowingly collect, use, sell, transfer, or share any images, information, or other data collected from an automated license plate recognition system. (C) Division (B) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (1) The collection or use of images, information, or other data collected from an automated license plate recognition system in the course of normal business activity, including for insurance purposes or for regulating access to private property; (2) The collection, use, or sharing of images, information, or other data collected from an automated license plate recognition system by a law enforcement agency or peace officer in the course of the agency or officer's law enforcement activities; (3) The collection, use, sale, transfer, or sharing of images, information, or other data collected from an automated license plate recognition system by a public entity to another public entity; (4) The collection, use, sale, transfer, or sharing of images, information, or other data collected from an automated license plate recognition system in accordance with section 149.43 or 4501.27 of the Revised Code. (D) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree.